New York, session 2025-2026, A7188.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. The real property actions and proceedings law is amended by 2 adding a new section 1308-a to read as follows: 3 § 1308-a. Assignment of counsel. A homeowner in a foreclosure action 4 who is financially unable to obtain counsel for representation in such 5 action shall have a right to assigned counsel by the court. Assignment 6 of counsel issued under this section shall be implemented as provided in 7 article eighteen-B of the county law. 8 § 2. Subdivision 3 of section 1303 of the real property actions and 9 proceedings law, as amended by section 5 of part Q of chapter 73 of the 10 laws of 2016, is amended to read as follows: 11 3. The notice to any mortgagor required by paragraph (a) of subdivi- 12 sion one of this section shall appear as follows: 13 Help for Homeowners in Foreclosure 14 New York State Law requires that we send you this notice about the 15 foreclosure process. Please read it carefully. 16 Summons and Complaint 17 You are in danger of losing your home. If you fail to respond to the 18 summons and complaint in this foreclosure action, you may lose your 19 home. Please read the summons and complaint carefully. You should imme- 20 diately contact an attorney or your local legal aid office to obtain 21 advice on how to protect yourself. 22 Sources of Information and Assistance 23 The State encourages you to become informed about your options in 24 foreclosure. In addition to seeking assistance from an attorney or legal EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00717-01-5 A. 7188 2 1 aid office, there are government agencies and non-profit organizations 2 that you may contact for information about possible options, including 3 trying to work with your lender during this process. You may be entitled 4 to assigned counsel if you are financially unable to obtain represen- 5 tation. 6 To locate an entity near you, you may call the toll-free helpline 7 maintained by the New York State Department of Financial Services at 8 (enter number) or visit the Department's website at (enter web address). 9 Rights and Obligations 10 YOU ARE NOT REQUIRED TO LEAVE YOUR HOME AT THIS TIME. You have the right 11 to stay in your home during the foreclosure process. You are not 12 required to leave your home unless and until your property is sold at 13 auction pursuant to a judgment of foreclosure and sale. 14 Regardless of whether you choose to remain in your home, YOU ARE 15 REQUIRED TO TAKE CARE OF YOUR PROPERTY and pay property taxes in accord- 16 ance with state and local law. 17 Foreclosure rescue scams 18 Be careful of people who approach you with offers to "save" your home. 19 There are individuals who watch for notices of foreclosure actions in 20 order to unfairly profit from a homeowner's distress. You should be 21 extremely careful about any such promises and any suggestions that you 22 pay them a fee or sign over your deed. State law requires anyone offer- 23 ing such services for profit to enter into a contract which fully 24 describes the services they will perform and fees they will charge, and 25 which prohibits them from taking any money from you until they have 26 completed all such promised services. 27 § 3. The article heading of article 18-B of the county law, as amended 28 by chapter 682 of the laws of 1977, is amended to read as follows: 29 REPRESENTATION OF PERSONS ACCUSED OF CRIME OR PARTIES BEFORE THE 30 FAMILY COURT OR SURROGATE'S COURT OR IN CERTAIN FORECLOSURE 31 ACTIONS 32 § 4. The opening paragraph of section 722 of the county law, as 33 amended by chapter 7 of the laws of 2007, is amended to read as follows: 34 The governing body of each county and the governing body of the city 35 in which a county is wholly contained shall place in operation through- 36 out the county a plan for providing counsel to persons charged with a 37 crime or who are entitled to counsel pursuant to section two hundred 38 sixty-two or section eleven hundred twenty of the family court act, 39 article six-C of the correction law, section four hundred seven of the 40 surrogate's court procedure act [or], article ten of the mental hygiene 41 law or section thirteen hundred eight-a of the real property actions and 42 proceedings law, who are financially unable to obtain counsel. Each plan 43 shall also provide for investigative, expert and other services neces- 44 sary for an adequate defense. The plan shall conform to one of the 45 following: 46 § 5. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 47 ing the date on which it shall have become a law.